Idaho, session 2026, H0952.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $20,000
Operating Expenditures 215,800
TOTAL $235,800
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.